Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Article 4.
Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 20-146.36. Application and construction.

In applying and construing this act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

(2001, c. 305.)

§ 20-146.37. Transitional provision.

A motion or other request for relief made in a child custody proceeding or to enforce a child custody determination that was commenced before July 1, 2001, is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or other request was made.

(2001, c. 305.)

§ 20-146.38. Construction of provisions; purposes of act.

The general purposes of this act are to:

Avoid jurisdictional competition and conflict with courts of other states in matters of child custody that have in the past resulted in the shifting of children from state to state with harmful effects on their well-being;

Promote cooperation with the courts of other states to the end that a custody decree is rendered in that state that can best decide the case in the interest of the child;

Ensure that litigation concerning the custody of a child take place ordinarily in the state with which the child and his family have the closest connection and where significant evidence concerning his care, protection, training, and personal relationships is most readily available, and that courts of this state decline the exercise of jurisdiction when the child and his family have a closer connection with another state;

Discourage continuing controversies over child custody in the interest of greater stability of home environment and of secure family relationships for the child;

Deter abductions and other unilateral removals of children undertaken to obtain custody awards;

Avoid relitigation of custody decisions of other states in this Commonwealth insofar as feasible;

Facilitate the enforcement of custody decrees of other states;

Promote and expand the exchange of information and other forms of mutual assistance between the courts of this Commonwealth and those of other states concerned with the same child; and

Make uniform the law of those states that enact it.

This act shall be construed to promote the general purposes stated in this section.

(2001, c. 305.)